Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-3224
Funds of districts; disbursement; treasurer's bond; secretary report changes.

(1) Funds of the district shall be paid out or expended only upon the authorization or approval of the board of directors and by:

(a) Check, draft, warrant, or other instrument in writing, signed by the treasurer, assistant treasurer, or such other officer, employee, or agent of the district as shall be authorized by the treasurer to sign on behalf of the treasurer; or

(b) Electronic payment system including an electronic funds transfer and automated clearinghouse transfer.

(2) The authorization of the treasurer for another to sign on behalf of the treasurer shall be in writing and filed with the secretary of the district.

(3) In the event that the treasurer's bond shall not expressly insure the district against loss resulting from the fraudulent, illegal, negligent, or otherwise wrongful or unauthorized acts or conduct by or on the part of any and every person authorized to sign on behalf of the treasurer, there shall be procured and filed with the secretary of the district, together with the authorization of the treasurer, a corporate surety bond, effective for protection against such loss, in such form and amount and with such corporate surety as shall be approved in writing by the signed endorsement thereon of any two officers of the district other than the treasurer.

(4) The secretary shall report to the board at each meeting any such bonds filed, or any change in the status of any such bonds, since the last previous meeting of the board.

Laws 1969, c. 9, § 24, p. 115;

Laws 2025, LB59, § 1.